Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.320

Fruit tree certification and nursery improvement program—Advisory committee.

An advisory committee is hereby established to advise the director in the administration of the fruit tree certification and nursery improvement program.

(1) The committee shall consist of five fruit tree nursery dealers and the director or the director's designated appointee.

(2) When appointing this committee, the director shall consider names submitted by the Washington state nursery and landscape association.

(3) The terms of the members of the committee shall be staggered and the members shall serve a term of three years and until their successor has been appointed.

In the event a committee member resigns, is disqualified, or vacates a position on the committee for any other reason the vacancy shall be filled by the director under the provisions of this section governing appointments.

[ 2000 c 144 s 11; 1993 c 120 s 6; 1990 c 261 s 5; 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 8.]